Utah statutes.
58-64-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Deception Detection Examiners Board consisting of:

(a)  three individuals who are licensed as deception detection examiners;

(b)  one individual from among nominees of the Commissioner of Public Safety;

(c)  one individual from among nominees of the Utah Peace Officers Association;

(d)  one individual from among nominees of the Utah State Bar; and

(e)  one individual representing the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation is disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Enacted by Chapter 215, 1995 General Session

